Texas, session 892, HB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 171.063, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Subsection (b) to read as follows: (b)  A physician may not provide to a pregnant woman an abortion-inducing drug unless the physician is physically present in this state and examines the woman in person at the time the physician provides the drug to the woman. SECTION 2.  Section 151.056, Occupations Code, is amended by amending Subsection (b) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b)  Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), this [This] section does not apply to the act of: (1)  a medical specialist located in another jurisdiction who provides only episodic consultation services on request to a physician licensed in this state who practices in the same medical specialty; (2)  a physician located in another jurisdiction who is providing consultation services to a medical school as defined by Section 61.501, Education Code; (3)  a physician located in another jurisdiction who is providing consultation services to an institution subject to: (A)  Subchapter C, Chapter 73, Education Code; or (B)  Subchapter K, Chapter 74, Education Code; or (4)  a physician located in another jurisdiction of a state having borders contiguous with the borders of this state who is the treating physician of a patient and orders home health or hospice services for a resident of this state to be delivered by a home and community support services agency licensed in this state. (b-1)  This section applies to a consultation service described by Subsection (b)(1), (2), or (3) if the service is the provision of an abortion-inducing drug, as defined by Section 171.061, Health and Safety Code. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.